District of Columbia statutes.
9-1213.04

Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction thereof in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia be fined not more than $10 for each day such violation shall continue. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules and regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

July 8, 1898, 30 Stat. 725, ch. 640, § 4
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207,§ 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 473, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 7-804.
1973 Ed., § 7-1104.